Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 1

Miscellaneous Provisions

66-19-101. Lien for repairs to conveyances generally.

There shall be a lien upon any type of conveyance used in the transportation of persons or merchandise either by land or by water or through the air, propelled by any sort of power, for any repairs or improvements made or parts or fixtures furnished at the request of the owner, or the owner's agent, in favor of the mechanic, contractor, founder, or machinist who makes on any such vehicle mentioned any repairs or puts thereon any improvements, fixtures, machinery, or materials; provided, that:

The lien shall not extend to, nor shall this section and § 66-19-102 be construed as in any way affecting the right and title acquired by a purchaser without notice; and

Any notice of the lien provided to an owner or the owner's agent and any advertisement of a sale to satisfy the lien, if authorized, shall include a brief description of the conveyance against which the lien exists and the vehicle identification number, if applicable and ascertainable.

Acts 1909, ch. 150, § 1; Shan., § 3546a1; mod. Code 1932, § 7960; Acts 1953, ch. 141, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1901; Acts 2014, ch. 886, § 1.

Cross-References. Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.

Extension of lien to aircraft, §66-19-302.

Motor vehicles, filing instruments evidencing, §§55-3-125,55-3-126.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, §§ 24, 31; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 19.

Law Reviews.

Liens — Priority between Holder of Mechanic's Lien and Judgment Creditor, 11 Tenn. L. Rev. 204 (1933).

66-19-102. Duration of lien.

The lien shall be upon and include the conveyance and improvements thereon, and continue for twelve (12) months after the work is finished or repairs made or material furnished and until the final decision of any suit that may be brought within that time for the debt to the contractor, or undertaker, or furnisher, and bind the conveyance and improvements thereon; provided, that the conveyance with improvements thereon has not been transferred in good faith to a purchaser without notice.

Acts 1909, ch. 150, § 2; Shan., § 3546a2; Acts 1919, ch. 55; mod. Code 1932, § 7961; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1902.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, §§ 24, 31; 18 Tenn. Juris., Mechanics' Liens, § 19.

66-19-103. Garagekeeper's or towing firm's lien.

Garagekeepers or establishments substantially in the business of towing vehicles for hire, pursuant to title 55, chapter 16, hereinafter referred to as “towing firms,” shall be entitled to a lien upon all vehicles that lawfully come into their possession and are retained in their possession until all reasonable charges due are paid. A garagekeeper may, after thirty (30) days, enforce this lien in the manner prescribed for the enforcement of artisans' liens under §§ 66-14-102 - 66-14-106, except the garagekeeper shall:

Only be required to advertise the sale one (1) time in a newspaper published in the place where the sale is to be held; and

Include the vehicle identification number, if it is ascertainable, in the notice required pursuant to § 66-14-103 and in the advertisement of the sale described in § 66-14-104.

If the motor vehicle, including any associated rental equipment, clearly identifies the rental company and a garagekeeper or towing firm lawfully comes into possession of the vehicle and any associated equipment, then the garagekeeper or towing firm shall notify the rental company at the address identified on the vehicle or associated equipment within three (3) working days of taking possession of such vehicle or equipment by registered mail return receipt requested.

The commissioner of commerce and insurance or the commissioner's designee shall notify the commissioner of safety of violations of subdivision (a)(1). Upon receiving such notice, the commissioner of safety shall suspend any contract that the state may have for towing services with the garagekeeper or towing firm for a period of sixty (60) days or notify the appropriate authority to suspend all such contracts with the state.

In addition to any other penalty provided for violation of this section, a violation of subdivision (a)(1) shall also be a violation of title 47, chapter 18, part 1, and the rental company may seek relief under that statute.

A garagekeeper or towing firm may not collect any storage or related fees for any period of time in which the garagekeeper or towing firm was in violation of subdivision (a)(1) with respect to a motor vehicle or associated equipment.

The commissioner of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations to effectuate the purposes of this subsection (a) in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Subdivisions (a)(1)(B) and (a)(2)-(5) and § 55-16-112 shall not apply to new or used motor vehicle dealers licensed under title 55, chapter 17, part 1.

For purposes of this section, “garagekeeper” means any operator of a parking place or establishment, motor vehicle storage facility, or establishment for the servicing, repair or maintenance of vehicles.

No person, firm, or entity shall have a right to a lien on any vehicle that has been towed without authorization of a police department or the owner of the vehicle or where the vehicle has been towed in violation of title 55, chapter 16. If the owner of the vehicle is not present, then prior to any person, firm or entity towing any vehicle, such person, firm or entity shall notify local law enforcement of the vehicle identification number (VIN), registration information, license plate number and description of the vehicle. Local law enforcement shall keep a record of all such information which shall be available for public inspection.

Any authorization made by a police department to tow a vehicle shall be made in writing. Such authorization shall include:

The name of the officer giving authorization;

The year, make and model, and color of the vehicle to be towed;

The reason for the tow;

The license plate number, if any; and

The vehicle identification number, if it is ascertainable.

A copy of such authorization shall be posted with the vehicle by the officer giving authorization, and shall remain with the vehicle until the vehicle is claimed by the owner.

No person, firm, or entity, unless licensed and regulated under title 55, chapter 17, part 1, shall have a right to a lien against a lienor, who is also the seller of such motor vehicle or who retains title under a title retention or conditional sale agreement, for repairs in excess of two hundred fifty dollars ($250) made on such motor vehicle, unless the person, firm or entity making the repairs has received a written authorization from lienor/seller to make such repairs on the motor vehicle.

Code 1932, § 7979; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 64-1903; Acts 1983, ch. 463, § 3; 1984, ch. 866, § 1; 1996, ch. 868, §§ 1, 6, 8; 1997, ch. 73, §§ 1, 5; 1998, ch. 733, § 1; 1998, ch. 760, § 2; 1998, ch. 1027, §§ 1-3, 5; 1999, ch. 1, § 3; 1999, ch. 235, § 1; 2004, ch. 460, § 1; 2005, ch. 275, § 1; 2011, ch. 244, § 2; 2014, ch. 886, § 2.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Enforcement of lien, §66-21-101.

Fee for storage beyond 60 days, §55-23-103.

Fees for storing motor vehicle, §55-23-103.

Notice of extension of fees for towing or storing motor vehicle, §55-23-104.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, § 24.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

66-19-104. Duty to inform consumer of rights.

Before beginning any repair work on a motor vehicle, an automotive repair facility shall inform the consumer for whom the repairs are to be done of the following rights:

That a consumer:

May request a written estimate for repairs that cost in excess of two hundred fifty dollars ($250); and

May not be charged an amount over twenty-five percent (25%) in excess of the written estimate without the consumer's consent or good faith attempt to acquire the consent; and

That repairs not originally authorized by the consumer may not be charged to the consumer without the consumer's consent unless a repair facility makes a good faith attempt to acquire the consent prior to providing additional repairs. A good faith attempt shall entail at least an attempted telephone call to the consumer.

The consumer's rights provided in subsection (a) shall be:

Displayed immediately before the space for the signature of the consumer conspicuously in easily readable type;

Physically separated from the other terms of the form used for authorization of repairs; and

Listed under the printed heading “Consumer's Rights.”

If any automotive repair facility informs a consumer orally of the consumer's rights, the facility shall record in writing:

The name of the persons who were notified or whom the facility attempted to notify;

The date and time of the notification or attempt; and

The signature of the person who made the notification or attempted notification.

Failure to comply with this section shall abrogate the repair facility's rights under § 66-19-103.

Nothing in this section shall apply to any person or entity licensed under title 55, chapter 17.

Acts 2001, ch. 194, § 1–3.

66-19-105. Abandoned vehicles on campgrounds.

Campgrounds substantially in the business of providing accommodations for recreational vehicles, as defined in § 55-50-102, shall be entitled to a lien upon all abandoned vehicles that lawfully come onto their premises. Such abandoned vehicles shall be retained in the campground owners' or managers' possession until all reasonable charges due are paid. A campground may, after sixty (60) days, enforce this lien in the manner prescribed for the enforcement of artisans' liens under §§ 66-14-102 — 66-14-106, except the campground shall:

Only be required to advertise the sale of an abandoned vehicle one (1) time in a newspaper published in the place where the sale is to be held; and

Include the vehicle identification number, if it is ascertainable, in the notice required pursuant to § 66-14-103 and in the advertisement of the sale described in § 66-14-104.

A campground may collect any storage or related fees for any period of time in which a vehicle or associated equipment is abandoned upon the campground premises.

The commissioner of commerce and insurance is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, to effectuate the purposes of this section.

For purposes of providing notice to persons having an interest as provided in § 66-14-102, the campground shall notify any person that the campground:

Has actual notice of an interest; and

If the property is required to have a title, conduct a search request with the department of safety, or such other state where the vehicle license tag indicates it is registered, and in the case of property which is not titled as a motor vehicle, submit a search request for the filing of a security interest under the Uniform Commercial Code, compiled in title 47, chapters 1-9, with the secretary of state and, in the state that is the apparent residence of the owner of the property, if other than Tennessee. The campground owner shall send, by certified mail, return receipt requested, notice of intent to enforce the lien to all known owners, all known interested parties, and to any other or interested party discernable through reasonable effort as provided in this subsection (d). For purposes of notice, there shall be a rebuttable presumption of reasonable inquiry and notice to interested parties, if the inquiry and notice provided in this subsection (d) is fulfilled.

Acts 2003, ch. 271, § 1; 2014, ch. 886, § 3.